Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0287.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16. A marriage solemnized before an individual professing to be a district judge, common pleas court judge, district court magistrate, municipal judge, judge of probate, judge of a federal court, mayor, the county clerk or, in a county having more than 2,000,000 inhabitants, an employee of the county clerk designated by the clerk to solemnize marriages, or a minister of the gospel or cleric or religious practitioner shall who is authorized to solemnize a marriage under section 7 is not be considered or adjudged to be void, nor shall and the validity of the marriage be is not affected, on account of a want lack of jurisdiction or authority by that individual if the marriage was consummated with a full belief on the part of the individuals married, or either of them, that they were lawfully joined in marriage. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 285 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.